Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.207

Structural pest inspector licenses—Examination.

The director shall require each applicant for a structural pest inspector license to demonstrate to the director the applicant's knowledge of applicable laws and regulations; structural pest identification and damage; and conditions conducive to the development of wood destroying organisms by satisfactorily passing a written examination for the classifications for which the applicant has applied prior to issuing the license.

[ 2003 c 212 s 6.]